Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 3

Minimum Compensation for Local Officials

7-51-301. Minimum compensation of chief elected executive of certain municipalities.

The minimum compensation payable to the chief elected executive of all municipalities or metropolitan governments having a population greater than one hundred seventy thousand (170,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall be twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per annum, payable in equal monthly installments.

Any municipality or metropolitan government may provide for greater compensation for the chief elected executive.

Acts 1971, ch. 345, § 1; T.C.A., § 6-808.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

7-51-302. Minimum salary of council members in certain municipalities.

The minimum salary payable to city and metropolitan council members in all municipalities having a population greater than one hundred seventy thousand (170,000), according to the 1970 federal census or any subsequent federal census, shall be three hundred dollars ($300) per month.

Acts 1971, ch. 345, § 3; T.C.A., § 6-810.

Compiler's Notes. For table of populations of Tennessee municipalities, see Volume 13 and its supplement.